Arkansas, session 2025, SB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 57, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-57-403. Make Arkansas Healthy Again Act — Prohibited substances in
food products.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Make Arkansas
Healthy Again Act".
(b) A person or entity shall not manufacture, sell, deliver,
distribute, hold, or offer for sale in commerce a food product for human
consumption that contains any of the following substances:
(1) Potassium bromate, also known as CAS no. 7758-01-2; or
*JMB131*
03-20-2025 14:10:26 JMB131

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB9
(2) Propylparaben, also known as CAS no. 94-13-3.
(c) Upon an action brought by the Attorney General, a city attorney, a
county attorney, or a prosecuting attorney, a person or entity that violates
subsection (b) of this section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a first violation, and not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act shall be effective on and after January 1, 2028.

/s/B. Davis

























03-20-2025 14:10:26 JMB131